Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1055.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 16174a. (1) The department shall establish a procedure that allows an individual to obtain a preliminary determination from the department concerning whether any court judgments against him or her the individual would likely result in a denial of a license or registration for failing to meet the good moral character requirement for that license or registration. (2) All of the following apply for purposes of subsection (1): (a) To obtain a preliminary determination under this section, an individual must file a request that meets all of the following: (i) Is submitted on a form provided by the department. (ii) Identifies the license or registration for which he or she the individual may apply. (iii) Includes a detailed description of any criminal proceedings that resulted in a judgment against him or her.the individual. (iv) Includes the nonrefundable fee required by the department. (b) The department shall only consider the information provided by an individual under subdivision (a)(ii) and (iii) in making a preliminary determination. An individual may include a statement with the request describing additional information for consideration by the department, including, but not limited to, information described in section 2(4) of 1974 PA 381, MCL 338.42. (c) A preliminary determination under this section that is adverse to an individual does not prevent the individual from subsequently applying for a license or registration. (d) The department or a board is not bound by a preliminary determination under this section that is not adverse to an individual if the individual applies for a license or registration under this act.article unless, at the time a completed application for the license or registration is submitted, the applicant has subsequently been convicted of a felony or has a previously undisclosed criminal conviction. (e) The issuance of a preliminary determination under this section does not limit the authority of the department to review applications for a license or registration, or to issue or deny a license or registration. (e) (f) The department shall notify an individual of a preliminary determination by delivering a preliminary determination letter to the individual, in a form determined by the department, not later than 60 days after the date the individual's request for a preliminary determination is received by the department. (3) An individual shall not request more than 1 preliminary determination under this section in any 120-day period. (4) The department shall not require an individual to complete any educational or training requirement before submitting a request for a predetermination under this section. Sec. 16241. (1) After administrative disciplinary action is final, the department shall publish a list of the names and addresses of disciplined individuals. The department shall indicate on the list that a final administrative disciplinary action is subject to judicial review. The department shall report disciplinary action to the department of community health and human services, the department of insurance and financial services, the state and federal agencies responsible for fiscal administration of federal health care programs, and the appropriate professional association. (2) Once each calendar year, the department shall transmit to the library of Michigan sufficient copies of a compilation of the lists required under subsection (1) for the immediately preceding 3 calendar years. The library of Michigan shall distribute the compilation to each depository library in this state. The department shall also transmit the compilation to each county clerk in this state once each calendar year. (3) The department of community health and human services shall report the disciplinary actions to appropriate licensed health facilities and agencies. The department of insurance and financial services shall report the disciplinary actions received from the department to insurance carriers providing professional liability insurance. (4) In case of a summary suspension of a license under section 16233(5), the department shall report the name and address of the individual whose license has been suspended to the department of community health and human services, the department of insurance and financial services, the state and federal agencies responsible for fiscal administration of federal health care programs, and the appropriate professional association. In case of a summary suspension of a license under section 16233(6), the department shall report the name and address of the pharmacy license that has been suspended to the department of community health and human services, the department of insurance and financial services, the state and federal agencies responsible for fiscal administration of federal health care programs, and the appropriate professional association. (5) A licensee or registrant whose license or registration is revoked or suspended under this article shall give notice of the revocation or suspension to each patient who contacts the licensee or registrant for professional services during the term of the revocation or suspension. The licensee or registrant may give the notice required under this subsection orally and shall give the notice required under this subsection at the time of contact. (6) A licensee or registrant whose license or registration is revoked or is suspended for more than 60 days under this article shall notify in writing each patient or client to whom the licensee or registrant rendered professional services in the licensee's or registrant's private practice during the 120 days immediately preceding the date of the final order imposing the revocation or suspension and to each individual who is already scheduled for professional services during the first 120 days after the date of the final order imposing the revocation or suspension. The notice must be on a form provided by the licensee's or registrant's board or task force and state, at a minimum, the name, address, and license or registration number of the licensee or registrant, the fact that his or her the licensee's or registrant's license or registration has been revoked or suspended, the effective date of the revocation or suspension, and the term of the revocation or suspension. Each board or task force shall develop a notice form that meets at least the minimum requirements of this subsection. The licensee or registrant shall send the notice to each patient or client to whom the licensee or registrant rendered professional services in the licensee's or registrant's private practice during the 120 days immediately preceding the date of the final order imposing the revocation or suspension within 30 days after the date of the final order imposing the revocation or suspension and shall simultaneously transmit a copy of the notice to the department. The licensee or registrant orally shall notify each individual who contacts the licensee or registrant for professional services during the first 120 days after the date of the final order imposing the revocation or suspension. The licensee or registrant shall also provide a copy of the notice within 10 days after the date of the final order imposing the revocation or suspension to his or her the licensee's or registrant's employer, if any, and to each hospital, if any, in which the licensee or registrant is admitted to practice. (7) A licensee or registrant who is reprimanded, fined, placed on probation, or ordered to pay restitution under this article or an applicant whose application for licensure or registration is denied under this article shall notify his or her the licensee's or registrant's employer, if any, and each hospital, if any, in which he or she the licensee or registrant is admitted to practice, in the same manner as provided for notice of revocation or suspension to an employer or hospital under subsection (6), within 10 days after the date of the final order imposing the sanction. (8) The department shall annually report to the legislature and to each board and task force on disciplinary actions taken under this article, article 7, and article 8. The department shall include, at a minimum, all of the following information in the report required under this subsection: (a) Investigations conducted, complaints issued, and settlements reached by the department, separated out by type of complaint and health profession. (b) Investigations and complaints closed or dismissed. (c) Actions taken by each disciplinary subcommittee, separated out by type of complaint, health profession, and final order issued. (d) Recommendations by boards and task forces. (e) The number of extensions and delays granted by the department that were in excess of the time limits required under this article for each phase of the disciplinary process, and the types of cases for which the extensions and delays were granted. (9) The department shall include both of the following in the report required under subsection (8): (a) The number of applications denied by the department. (b) The number of applications denied by the department because of an applicant's lack of good moral character and a summary, by license or registration and by category of offense, of the criminal convictions on which those denials were based.